GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-countries.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     country names, capitals and demonyms
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj

+Demonym
+Country
+Continent
+Place
+State

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Abbr +Acron

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space
[h]	! add h for masculine plural 


!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON ROOT 
Algeria+Prop+Country				FSG;
Angola+Prop+Country				MSG;
Antartide+Prop+Country				FSG;
Argentina+Prop+Country				FSG;
Armenia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Australia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Austria+Prop+Country				FSG;
Bangladesh+Prop+Country				MSG;
Barbados+Prop+Country				MPL;
Belize+Prop+Country				MSG;
Bermuda+Prop+Country				FPL;
Bielorussia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Birmania+Prop+Country				FSG;
Bolivia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Bosnia-Herzegovina+Prop+Country			FSG;
Bosnia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Botswana+Prop+Country				MSG;
Brunei+Prop+Country				MSG;
Bulgaria+Prop+Country				FSG;
Cambogia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Camerun+Prop+Country				MSG;
Cecoslovacchia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Ciad+Prop+Country				MSG;
Cina+Prop+Country				FSG;
Cipro+Prop+Country				MSG;
Cisgiordania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Colombia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Comore+Prop+Country				FPL;
Croazia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Ecuador+Prop+Country				MSG;
Eritrea+Prop+Country				FSG;
Etiopia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Figi+Prop+Country				FPL;
Filippine+Prop+Country				FPL;
Francia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Gabon+Prop+Country				MSG;
Gambia+Prop+Country				MSG;
Germania+Prop+Country				FSG;
Giappone+Prop+Country				MSG;
Gibilterra+Prop+Country				FSG;
Grecia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Guadalupa+Prop+Country				FSG;
Guatemala+Prop+Country				MSG;
Haiti+Prop+Country				MSG;
Indonesia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Iran+Prop+Country				MSG;
Iraq+Prop+Country				MSG;
Irlanda+Prop+Country				FSG;
Italia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Kazakhistan+Prop+Country			MSG;
Kirghizistan+Prop+Country			MSG;
Kuwait+Prop+Country				MSG;
Lesotho+Prop+Country				MSG;
Lettonia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Libia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Liechtenstein+Prop+Country			MSG;
Macedonia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Madagascar+Prop+Country				MSG;
Maldive+Prop+Country				FPL;
Mali+Prop+Country				MSG;
Malta+Prop+Country				FSG;
Mauritania+Prop+Country				FSG;
Mauritius+Prop+Country				FPL;
Messico+Prop+Country				MSG;
Moldavia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Mozambico+Prop+Country				MSG;
Namibia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Nepal+Prop+Country				MSG;
Niger+Prop+Country				MSG;
Norvegia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Pakistan+Prop+Country				MSG;
Panamá+Prop+Country				MSG;
Perù+Prop+Country				MSG;
Polonia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Qatar+Prop+Country				MSG;
Romania+Prop+Country				FSG;
Samoa+Prop+Country				FPL;
Scozia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Senegal+Prop+Country				MSG;
Seychelles+Prop+Country				FSG;
Slovacchia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Somalia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Sudafrica+Prop+Country				MSG;
Suriname+Prop+Country				MSG;
Svezia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Tagikistan+Prop+Country				MSG;
Tailandia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Thailandia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Togo+Prop+Country				MSG;
Tunisia+Prop+Country				FSG;
Ucraina+Prop+Country				FSG;
Uganda+Prop+Country				MSG;
Uruguay+Prop+Country				MSG;
Venezuela+Prop+Country				MSG;
Yemen+Prop+Country				MSG;
Zimbabwe+Prop+Country				MSG;
Cartagine+Prop+Country				MSG;
Caralis+Prop+Country				MSG;
Città% del% Vaticano+Prop+Country		FSG;
Burkina% Faso+Prop+Country			MSG;
Confederazione% Elvetica+Prop+Country		FSG;
El% Salvador+Prop+Country			MSG;
Emirati% Arabi% Uniti+Prop+Country		MPL;
Federazione% Russa+Prop+Country			FSG;
Guyana% Francese+Prop+Country			FSG;
Hong% Kong+Prop+Country				FSG;
Nuova% Zelanda+Prop+Country			FSG;
Paesi% Bassi+Prop+Country			MPL;
Polinesia% Francese+Prop+Country		FSG;
Regno% Unito+Prop+Country			MSG;
Repubblica% Ceca+Prop+Country			FSG;
Repubblica% Centroafricana+Prop+Country		FSG;
Repubblica% di% Cipro+Prop+Country		FSG;
Repubblica% Democratica% del% Congo+Prop+Country	FSG;
Republica% Dominicana+Prop+Country		FSG;
Repubblica% Popolare% Cinese+Prop+Country	FSG;
Samoa% Americane+Prop+Country			FPL;
San% Marino+Prop+Country			MSG;
Sri% Lanka+Prop+Country				MSG;
Stati% Uniti% d'America+Prop+Country		MPL;
Stati% Uniti+Prop+Country			MPL;
Sud% Africa+Prop+Country			MPL;
Timor% Est+Prop+Country				FSG;
Unione% delle% Repubbliche% Socialiste% Sovietiche+Prop+Country		FSG;
Urss+Prop+Country				FSG;
URSS+Prop+Country				FSG;
U.S.A.+Prop+Country+Acron			MPL;
G.B.+Prop+Country+Acron				MSG;
Alabama+Prop+State				MSG;
Arizona+Prop+State				MSG;
Colorado+Prop+State				MSG;
Delaware+Prop+State				MSG;
Distretto% della% Columbia+Prop+State		MSG;
Florida+Prop+State				FSG;
Hawaii+Prop+State				FPL;
Illinois+Prop+State				MSG;
Iowa+Prop+State					MSG;
Kentucky+Prop+State				MSG;
Louisiana+Prop+State				FSG;
Maryland+Prop+State				MSG;
Michigan+Prop+State				MSG;
Mississippi+Prop+State				MSG;
Montana+Prop+State				MSG;
Nevada+Prop+State				MSG;
New% Jersey+Prop+State				MSG;
Nuovo% Messico+Prop+State			MSG;
North% Carolina+Prop+State			MSG;
North% Dakota+Prop+State			MSG;
Ohio+Prop+State					MSG;
Oregon+Prop+State				MSG;
South% Carolina+Prop+State			MSG;
South% Dakota+Prop+State			MSG;
Tennessee+Prop+State				MSG;
Utah+Prop+State					MSG;
Virginia+Prop+State				FSG;
Wisconsin+Prop+State				MSG;
algerino+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
antartico+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;	!pl:-ci
argentino+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
australiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
palestinese+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
bangladese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
bielorusso+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
bosniaco+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;	!pl:-ci
bulgaro+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
camerunese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
capoverdiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
cileno+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
cipriota+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
vaticano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
nordcoreano+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
ivoriano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
croato+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
danese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
egiziano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
eritreo+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
etiope+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
filippino+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
francese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
gallese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
giamaicano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
giordano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
groenlandese+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
guineano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
honduregno+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
indonesiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
iranico+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;	!pl:-ci
irlandese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
islandese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
italiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
keniota+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
kosovaro+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
laotiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
libanese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
libico+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;	!pl:-ci
lussemburghese+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
malgascio+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
malese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
maltese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
mauritano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
messicano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
mongolo+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
mozambicano+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
namibiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
nicaraguegno+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
nigeriano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
neozelandese+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
olandese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
panamense+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
peruviano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
portoricano+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
monegasc[h]o+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
cec[h]o+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
dominicano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
samoano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
serbo+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
sloveno+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
scandinavo+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
svedese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
taiwanese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
tunisino+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
ugandese+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
uzbeko+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
zambiano+NAdj+Demonym+Country			MFSGPL;
cartaginese+NAdj+Demonym+Country		MFSGPL;
America+Prop+Continent				FSG;
Asia+Prop+Continent				FSG;
Eurasia+Prop+Continent				FSG;
Oceania+Prop+Continent				FSG;
America% del% Sud+Prop+Continent		FSG;	
America% Meridionale+Prop+Continent		FSG;	
africano+NAdj+Demonym+Continent			MFSGPL;
europeo+NAdj+Demonym+Continent			MFSGPL;
latinoamericano+NAdj+Demonym+Continent		MFSGPL;
